Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-172
Offstreet parking; revenue; use.

Any city of the second class is authorized to use any or all of the revenue from onstreet parking meters for the purpose set forth in section 17-164 if such revenue has not been pledged for the payment of revenue bonds authorized in sections 17-163 to 17-173.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 10, p. 189;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 60.